New York, session 2025-2026, S4464.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 854 of the general municipal law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 22 to read as follows: 3 (22) "Labor organization"--shall mean any organization which exists 4 and is constituted for the purpose, in whole or in part, of collective 5 bargaining, or of dealing with employers concerning grievances, terms or 6 conditions of employment, or of other mutual aid or protection and which 7 is not a company union. 8 § 2. Subdivision 2 of section 856 of the general municipal law, as 9 amended by chapter 356 of the laws of 1993, is amended to read as 10 follows: 11 2. (a) An agency shall be a corporate governmental agency, constitut- 12 ing a public benefit corporation. Except as otherwise provided by 13 special act of the legislature, an agency shall consist of not less than 14 three nor more than [seven] nine members who shall be appointed by the 15 governing body of each municipality and who shall serve at the pleasure 16 of the appointing authority. 17 (b) Such members may include representatives of local government[, 18 school boards, organized labor] and business, and shall at least include 19 a representative of a local labor organization and either a school 20 district superintendent or a representative of a school board. A member 21 shall continue to hold office until [his] their successor is appointed EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03309-04-6 S. 4464--A 2 1 and has qualified. The governing body of each municipality shall desig- 2 nate the first [chairman] chairperson and file with the secretary of 3 state a certificate of appointment or reappointment of any member. Such 4 members shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be 5 entitled to the necessary expenses, including traveling expenses, 6 incurred in the discharge of their duties. 7 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 8 it shall have become a law.